Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
PENALTIES

§342P-20 Civil penalties. (a) Any
person who violates this chapter, any rule adopted by the department under this
chapter, or any condition in a permit or variance issued under this chapter,
shall be fined not more than $10,000 for each separate offense. Each day of
each violation shall constitute a separate offense. Any action taken in
environmental court to impose or collect the penalty provided for in this
subsection shall be considered a civil action.

(b) Any person who denies, obstructs, or
hampers the entrance or inspection by any duly authorized officer or employee
of the department of any building or place that the officer or employee is
authorized to enter and inspect, shall be fined not more than $5,000. Any
action taken in environmental court to impose or collect the penalty provided
for in this subsection shall be considered a civil action. [L 1991, c 219, pt
of §1; am L 1995, c 180, §39; am L 1998, c 242, §9; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next